fi/fi_FI.aff
FLAG num
SFX 37142 N 1
SFX 37142 lista -listoja .
SFX 37143 N 1
SFX 37143 lista -listojen .
SFX 37144 N 1
SFX 37144 listaus -listauksia .
SFX 37145 N 1
SFX 37145 piste -pisteiden .
SFX 37146 N 1
SFX 37146 piste -pisteissä .
SFX 37147 N 1
SFX 37147 piste -pisteistä .
SFX 37148 N 1
SFX 37148 piste -pistettä .
SFX 37149 N 1
SFX 37149 sijoitus -sijoituksen .
SFX 37150 Y 1
SFX 37150 0 ta .
PFX 37150 Y 1
PFX 37150 ranking ranking- .
SFX 37151 Y 1
SFX 37151 0 ten .
PFX 37151 Y 1
PFX 37151 ranking ranking- .
SFX 37152 Y 1
SFX 37152 0 nsa .
PFX 37152 Y 1
PFX 37152 ranking ranking- .
SFX 37153 N 1
SFX 37153 ykkönen -ykkönen .
SFX 37154 N 1
SFX 37154 ka emmankin .
SFX 37155 N 1
SFX 37155 ka emmissa .
SFX 37156 N 1
SFX 37156 ka empaakin .
SFX 37157 N 1
SFX 37157 ka immaksi .
SFX 37158 N 1
SFX 37158 ka immalta .
SFX 37159 N 1
SFX 37159 ka immassa .
SFX 37160 N 1
SFX 37160 ka immista .
SFX 37161 N 1
SFX 37161 ka impaan .
SFX 37162 N 1
SFX 37162 ka impana .
SFX 37163 N 1
SFX 37163 ka impien .
SFX 37164 N 1
SFX 37164 ka impiin .
SFX 37165 N 1
SFX 37165 ka ing .
SFX 37166 N 1
SFX 37166 ki immilla .
SFX 37167 N 1
SFX 37167 ki ing .
PFX 37168 N 1
PFX 37168 r ranteit .
SFX 37169 N 1
SFX 37169 ne teitteni .
SFX 37170 N 1
SFX 37170 evaihto keenvaihto .
PFX 37171 N 1
PFX 37171 ranne ranteen .
SFX 37172 Y 1
SFX 37172 in timet .
PFX 37172 Y 1
PFX 37172 ranne ranteen .
SFX 37173 Y 1
SFX 37173 in timien .
PFX 37173 Y 1
PFX 37173 ranne ranteen .
SFX 37174 Y 1
SFX 37174 in timistä .
PFX 37174 Y 1
PFX 37174 ranne ranteen .
SFX 37175 Y 1
SFX 37175 in timiä .
PFX 37175 Y 1
PFX 37175 ranne ranteen .
SFX 37176 N 1
SFX 37176 sanko tasankoa .
PFX 37177 N 1
PFX 37177 ranska ranskan .
SFX 37178 N 1
SFX 37178 kieli nkieleen .
SFX 37179 N 1
SFX 37179 kieli nkielellä .
SFX 37180 N 1
SFX 37180 kieli nkielen .
SFX 37181 N 1
SFX 37181 kieli nkielessä .
SFX 37182 N 1
SFX 37182 kieli nkielestä .
SFX 37183 N 1
SFX 37183 kurssi nkurssille .
PFX 37184 N 1
PFX 37184 ranskalais ranskalais- .
SFX 37185 Y 1
SFX 37185 nen sen .
PFX 37185 Y 1
PFX 37185 ranskalais ranskalais- .
SFX 37186 Y 1
SFX 37186 nen sesta .
PFX 37186 Y 1
PFX 37186 ranskalais ranskalais- .
SFX 37187 N 1
SFX 37187 belgialainen -belgialaisen .
SFX 37188 N 1
SFX 37188 espanjalainen -espanjalaisen .
SFX 37189 N 1
SFX 37189 romanttinen -romanttiset .
SFX 37190 N 1
SFX 37190 saksalainen -saksalaista .
SFX 37191 N 1
SFX 37191 suomalainen -suomalaisella .
SFX 37192 N 1
SFX 37192 suomalainen -suomalaisessa .
SFX 37193 N 1
SFX 37193 suomalainen -suomalaisesta .
SFX 37194 N 1
SFX 37194 leipä nleipiä .
SFX 37195 N 1
SFX 37195 leipä nleipä .
SFX 37196 N 1
SFX 37196 leipä nleipää .
SFX 37197 N 1
SFX 37197 leipä nleipään .
SFX 37198 N 1
SFX 37198 leipä nleivällä .
SFX 37199 N 1
SFX 37199 leipä nleivän .
SFX 37200 N 1
SFX 37200 leipä nleivästä .
SFX 37201 N 1
SFX 37201 lilja nlilja .
SFX 37202 Y 1
SFX 37202 0 a .
PFX 37202 Y 1
PFX 37202 ranska ranskan .
SFX 37203 Y 1
SFX 37203 i eilla .
PFX 37203 Y 1
PFX 37203 ranska ranskan .
SFX 37204 Y 1
SFX 37204 i eja .
PFX 37204 Y 1
PFX 37204 ranska ranskan .
SFX 37205 Y 1
SFX 37205 0 en .
PFX 37205 Y 1
PFX 37205 ranska ranskan .
SFX 37206 Y 1
SFX 37206 0 t .
PFX 37206 Y 1
PFX 37206 ranska ranskan .
SFX 37207 N 1
SFX 37207 peru nperunat .
SFX 37208 N 1
SFX 37208 peruna nperuna .
SFX 37209 N 1
SFX 37209 peruna nperunaa .
SFX 37210 N 1
SFX 37210 peruna nperunan .
SFX 37211 N 1
SFX 37211 peruna nperunat .
SFX 37212 N 1
SFX 37212 peruna nperunoiden .
SFX 37213 N 1
SFX 37213 peruna nperunoihin .
SFX 37214 N 1
SFX 37214 peruna nperunoilla .
SFX 37215 N 1
SFX 37215 peruna nperunoista .
SFX 37216 N 1
SFX 37216 peruna nperunoita .
SFX 37217 Y 1
SFX 37217 0 tta .
PFX 37217 Y 1
PFX 37217 ranska ranskan .
SFX 37218 N 1
SFX 37218 pulla npulla .
SFX 37219 N 1
SFX 37219 pulla npullaa .
SFX 37220 N 1
SFX 37220 pulla npullan .
SFX 37221 N 1
SFX 37221 pulla npullasta .
SFX 37222 N 1
SFX 37222 pulla npullat .
SFX 37223 N 1
SFX 37223 ravuri nravuri .
PFX 37224 N 1
PFX 37224 ranska ranskalais .
SFX 37225 N 1
SFX 37225 tyylinen laistyylisen .
SFX 37226 N 1
SFX 37226 tyylinen laistyylisessä .
SFX 37227 N 1
SFX 37227 tyylinen laistyyliset .
SFX 37228 N 1
SFX 37228 tyylinen laistyylistä .
SFX 37229 N 1
SFX 37229 tyylinen laistyyppinen .
SFX 37230 N 1
SFX 37230 ta noillakin .
SFX 37231 N 1
SFX 37231 ta noillemme .
SFX 37232 N 1
SFX 37232 ta noiltakin .
PFX 37233 N 1
PFX 37233 ranta rannan .
SFX 37234 N 1
SFX 37234 juuri njuurella .
SFX 37235 N 1
SFX 37235 lehti nlehden .
SFX 37236 N 1
SFX 37236 lehti nlehdistä .
SFX 37237 N 1
SFX 37237 lehti nlehti .
SFX 37238 N 1
SFX 37238 lehti nlehtien .
SFX 37239 N 1
SFX 37239 lehti nlehtiä .
SFX 37240 N 1
SFX 37240 ea 0 .
SFX 37241 N 1
SFX 37241 a ttuessaan .
SFX 37242 N 1
SFX 37242 nen stia .
SFX 37243 N 1
SFX 37243 nen stista .
SFX 37244 N 1
SFX 37244 termi -termiä .
SFX 37245 N 1
SFX 37245 ssieto ksensiedon .
SFX 37246 N 1
SFX 37246 ssieto ksensietoa .
SFX 37247 N 1
SFX 37247 s altakin .
SFX 37248 N 1
SFX 37248 s ammalle .
SFX 37249 N 1
SFX 37249 s ammankin .
SFX 37250 N 1
SFX 37250 s ammassa .
SFX 37251 N 1
SFX 37251 s ammasta .
SFX 37252 N 1
SFX 37252 s ammatkin .
SFX 37253 N 1
SFX 37253 s ammilla .
SFX 37254 N 1
SFX 37254 s ammissa .
SFX 37255 N 1
SFX 37255 s ampaakin .
SFX 37256 N 1
SFX 37256 s ampien .
SFX 37257 N 1
SFX 37257 s ampina .
SFX 37258 N 1
SFX 37258 s anahan .
SFX 37259 N 1
SFX 37259 s anakaan .
SFX 37260 N 1
SFX 37260 s anakin .
SFX 37261 N 1
SFX 37261 s anako .
SFX 37262 N 1
SFX 37262 s us .
SFX 37263 N 1
SFX 37263 s destahan .
SFX 37264 N 1
SFX 37264 n mu .
SFX 37265 N 1
SFX 37265 a poja .
PFX 37266 N 1
PFX 37266 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37267 Y 1
SFX 37267 0 lla .
PFX 37267 Y 1
PFX 37267 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37268 Y 1
SFX 37268 0 a .
PFX 37268 Y 1
PFX 37268 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37269 Y 1
SFX 37269 0 n .
PFX 37269 Y 1
PFX 37269 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37270 Y 1
SFX 37270 0 na .
PFX 37270 Y 1
PFX 37270 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37271 Y 1
SFX 37271 0 t .
PFX 37271 Y 1
PFX 37271 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37272 Y 1
SFX 37272 a ia .
PFX 37272 Y 1
PFX 37272 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37273 Y 1
SFX 37273 a ien .
PFX 37273 Y 1
PFX 37273 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37274 Y 1
SFX 37274 a iin .
PFX 37274 Y 1
PFX 37274 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37275 Y 1
SFX 37275 a ista .
PFX 37275 Y 1
PFX 37275 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37276 Y 1
SFX 37276 0 ä .
PFX 37276 Y 1
PFX 37276 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37277 Y 1
SFX 37277 ki ille .
PFX 37277 Y 1
PFX 37277 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37278 Y 1
SFX 37278 ki it .
PFX 37278 Y 1
PFX 37278 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37279 Y 1
SFX 37279 i essä .
PFX 37279 Y 1
PFX 37279 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37280 Y 1
SFX 37280 0 ttä .
PFX 37280 Y 1
PFX 37280 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37281 Y 1
SFX 37281 e keen .
PFX 37281 Y 1
PFX 37281 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37282 Y 1
SFX 37282 e keillä .
PFX 37282 Y 1
PFX 37282 rasva rasvan .
SFX 37283 N 1
SFX 37283 ta dastamme .
SFX 37284 N 1
SFX 37284 ta doillamme .
SFX 37285 N 1
SFX 37285 as kaiseva .
SFX 37286 N 1
SFX 37286 as kaisevin .
SFX 37287 N 1
SFX 37287 as kaisu .
SFX 37288 N 1
SFX 37288 as taaksi .
SFX 37289 N 1
SFX 37289 as taanne .
SFX 37290 N 1
SFX 37290 da neissa .
SFX 37291 N 1
SFX 37291 et seessa .
SFX 37292 N 1
SFX 37292 ta emattomissa .
SFX 37293 N 1
SFX 37293 ta emiksi .
SFX 37294 N 1
SFX 37294 ta seesi .
SFX 37295 N 1
SFX 37295 0 vanaan .
SFX 37296 N 1
SFX 37296 0 vanamme .
SFX 37297 N 1
SFX 37297 0 vina .
SFX 37298 N 1
SFX 37298 a takseen .
SFX 37299 N 1
SFX 37299 ta neissa .
SFX 37300 N 1
SFX 37300 aa ettavalta .
SFX 37301 N 1
SFX 37301 aa ettavanani .
SFX 37302 N 1
SFX 37302 s ksenopettajalle .
SFX 37303 N 1
SFX 37303 s ksenopettajalta .
SFX 37304 N 1
SFX 37304 s ksenopettajamme .
SFX 37305 N 1
SFX 37305 s ksenopettajan .
SFX 37306 N 1
SFX 37306 s ksenopettajani .
SFX 37307 N 1
SFX 37307 s ksenopettajille .
SFX 37308 N 1
SFX 37308 s ksenopetusta .
SFX 37309 Y 1
SFX 37309 s ksella .
PFX 37309 Y 1
PFX 37309 ratsas ratsastuksenope .
SFX 37310 N 1
SFX 37310 ti neistani .
SFX 37311 N 1
SFX 37311 sohjaaja ksenohjaaja .
SFX 37312 N 1
SFX 37312 sohjaaja ksenohjaajaksi .
SFX 37313 N 1
SFX 37313 sohjaaja ksenohjaajan .
SFX 37314 N 1
SFX 37314 sohjaaja ksenohjaajana .
SFX 37315 N 1
SFX 37315 sohjaaja ksenohjaajia .
SFX 37316 N 1
SFX 37316 sopettaja ksenopettajaa .
SFX 37317 N 1
SFX 37317 sopettaja ksenopettajalle .
SFX 37318 N 1
SFX 37318 sopettaja ksenopettajia .
SFX 37319 N 1
SFX 37319 as paisiin .
SFX 37320 N 1
SFX 37320 liike 0 .
SFX 37321 N 1
SFX 37321 a koksi .
SFX 37322 N 1
SFX 37322 on koa .
SFX 37323 N 1
SFX 37323 at idensa .
SFX 37324 N 1
SFX 37324 at ineni .
SFX 37325 N 1
SFX 37325 at isiimme .
SFX 37326 N 1
SFX 37326 at isiini .
SFX 37327 N 1
SFX 37327 at isiisi .
SFX 37328 N 1
SFX 37328 at issakaan .
SFX 37329 N 1
SFX 37329 at itani .
SFX 37330 N 1
SFX 37330 a isinta .
SFX 37331 N 1
SFX 37331 sti mmissa .
SFX 37332 N 1
SFX 37332 a tuessaan .
SFX 37333 N 1
SFX 37333 tua utaanpa .
SFX 37334 N 1
SFX 37334 tua uttuani .
SFX 37335 N 1
SFX 37335 tua uttuasi .
SFX 37336 N 1
SFX 37336 ki gellakaan .
SFX 37337 N 1
SFX 37337 ka gastakin .
SFX 37338 Y 1
SFX 37338 nen sia .
PFX 37338 Y 1
PFX 37338 rauta raudan .
SFX 37339 N 1
SFX 37339 0 asema .
SFX 37340 N 1
SFX 37340 asema naseman .
SFX 37341 N 1
SFX 37341 katu nkadulle .
SFX 37342 N 1
SFX 37342 katu nkadulta .
SFX 37343 N 1
SFX 37343 katu nkatua .
SFX 37344 N 1
SFX 37344 omenapuu nomenapuu .
PFX 37345 N 1
PFX 37345 rautatie rautatien .
SFX 37346 N 1
SFX 37346 tori ntori .
SFX 37347 N 1
SFX 37347 tori ntoria .
SFX 37348 N 1
SFX 37348 tori ntorilla .
SFX 37349 N 1
SFX 37349 tori ntorille .
SFX 37350 N 1
SFX 37350 tori ntorilta .
SFX 37351 N 1
SFX 37351 tori ntorin .
SFX 37352 N 1
SFX 37352 to noksesi .
SFX 37353 N 1
SFX 37353 to notta .
SFX 37354 N 1
SFX 37354 0 lat .
SFX 37355 N 1
SFX 37355 ite laitteiden .
SFX 37356 N 1
SFX 37356 ki ankin .
SFX 37357 N 1
SFX 37357 työntekijä 0 .
SFX 37358 N 1
SFX 37358 topuute nonpuutetta .
SFX 37359 N 1
SFX 37359 da maton .
SFX 37360 N 1
SFX 37360 iä eihin .
SFX 37361 N 1
SFX 37361 kanslia nkansliaan .
PFX 37362 N 1
PFX 37362 rehtori rehtorin .
SFX 37363 Y 1
SFX 37363 e keista .
PFX 37363 Y 1
PFX 37363 reikä reiän .
SFX 37364 N 1
SFX 37364 sti mman .
SFX 37365 N 1
SFX 37365 as paammaksi .
SFX 37366 N 1
SFX 37366 as paammalla .
SFX 37367 N 1
SFX 37367 as paammalle .
SFX 37368 N 1
SFX 37368 as paammalta .
SFX 37369 N 1
SFX 37369 as paamman .
SFX 37370 N 1
SFX 37370 as paammassa .
SFX 37371 N 1
SFX 37371 as paammasta .
SFX 37372 N 1
SFX 37372 as paammat .
SFX 37373 N 1
SFX 37373 as paammiksi .
SFX 37374 N 1
SFX 37374 as paammilla .
SFX 37375 N 1
SFX 37375 as paammissa .
SFX 37376 N 1
SFX 37376 as paampaa .
SFX 37377 N 1
SFX 37377 as paampaakin .
SFX 37378 N 1
SFX 37378 as paampaan .
SFX 37379 N 1
SFX 37379 as paampana .
SFX 37380 N 1
SFX 37380 as paampi .
SFX 37381 N 1
SFX 37381 as paampia .
SFX 37382 N 1
SFX 37382 as paampien .
SFX 37383 N 1
SFX 37383 as paampiin .
SFX 37384 N 1
SFX 37384 as paimman .
SFX 37385 N 1
SFX 37385 as paimmasta .
SFX 37386 N 1
SFX 37386 as paimmat .
SFX 37387 N 1
SFX 37387 as paimpia .
SFX 37388 N 1
SFX 37388 as paine .
SFX 37389 N 1
SFX 37389 as painta .
SFX 37390 N 1
SFX 37390 na takin .
SFX 37391 N 1
SFX 37391 än timeen .
SFX 37392 N 1
SFX 37392 än timessä .
SFX 37393 N 1
SFX 37393 än timillä .
SFX 37394 N 1
SFX 37394 ti eillämme .
SFX 37395 N 1
SFX 37395 ti eilläni .
SFX 37396 N 1
SFX 37396 ti illämme .
SFX 37397 N 1
SFX 37397 ti illänsä .
SFX 37398 N 1
SFX 37398 ti iltämme .
SFX 37399 N 1
SFX 37399 ti ithän .
SFX 37400 N 1
SFX 37400 tä illeni .
SFX 37401 N 1
SFX 37401 tä iltään .
SFX 37402 N 1
SFX 37402 den ty .
SFX 37403 N 1
SFX 37403 dä tyessä .
SFX 37404 N 1
SFX 37404 dä tykää .
SFX 37405 N 1
SFX 37405 dä tymällä .
SFX 37406 N 1
SFX 37406 n kää .
SFX 37407 N 1
SFX 37407 0 nit .
SFX 37408 N 1
SFX 37408 nen dy .
SFX 37409 N 1
SFX 37409 en nit .
SFX 37410 N 1
SFX 37410 tyä dyttyäsi .
SFX 37411 N 1
SFX 37411 ä eröidy .
SFX 37412 N 1
SFX 37412 kki tki .
SFX 37413 N 1
SFX 37413 kki tkille .
SFX 37414 N 1
SFX 37414 ti neissamme .
SFX 37415 N 1
SFX 37415 ne teimmat .
SFX 37416 N 1
SFX 37416 da massamme .
